Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-328
Judicial review; costs.

Costs shall not be allowed against the board of adjustment unless it appears to the court that it acted with gross negligence, in bad faith or with malice in making the decision appealed from.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 11(5), p. 690.